Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.15.025

"Building fees" defined—Use.

The term "building fees" means the fees charged students registering at the state's colleges and universities, which fees are to be used as follows: At the University of Washington, solely for the purposes provided in RCW 28B.15.210; at Washington State University, solely for the purposes provided in RCW 28B.15.310; at each of the regional universities and at The Evergreen State College, solely for the purposes provided in RCW 28B.35.370; and at the community and technical colleges, for the purposes provided in RCW 28B.50.320, 28B.50.360 and 28B.50.370. The term "building fees" is a renaming of the "general tuition fee," and shall not be construed to affect otherwise moneys pledged to, or used for bond retirement purposes.

[ 2015 c 55 s 209; 1985 c 390 s 12.]